Maryland, session 2026, HB1491.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–811.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “COMMISSION” MEANS THE INTERJURISDICTIONAL SAFE
PATHWAYS COMMISSION.
(3) “IEP” MEANS AN INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION PROGRAM AS
DEFINED UNDER THE FEDERAL INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES EDUCATION ACT.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1491*

HOUSE BILL 1491
(4) (I) “SAFE PATHWAYS” MEANS PHYSICAL INFRASTRUCTURE TO
ENSURE SAFE ROUTES FOR STUDENTS TRAVELING TO AND FROM SCHOOL,
INCLUDING SIDEWALKS, CROSSWALKS, TRAFFIC CALMING MEASURES, BIKE LANES,
PEDESTRIAN BRIDGES, AND SCHOOL ZONE SIGNAGE.
(II) “SAFE PATHWAYS” INCLUDES EDUCATIONAL PROGRAMS
AND POLICY INITIATIVES THAT PROMOTE SAFE ROUTES FOR STUDENTS TRAVELING
TO AND FROM SCHOOL.
(B) THERE IS AN INTERJURISDICTIONAL SAFE PATHWAYS COMMISSION.
(C) (1) THE COMMISSION CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS:
(I) THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT OF SCHOOLS, OR THE STATE
SUPERINTENDENT’S DESIGNEE;
(II) THE SECRETARY OF TRANSPORTATION, OR THE
SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(III) THE SECRETARY OF HEALTH, OR THE SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE;
(IV) THE SECRETARY OF DISABILITIES, OR THE SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE; AND
(V) THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS, APPOINTED BY THE STATE
SUPERINTENDENT:
1. FOUR REPRESENTATIVES FROM LOCAL SCHOOL
SYSTEMS;
2. THREE REPRESENTATIVES FROM MUNICIPAL LOCAL
MANAGEMENT BOARDS;
3. ONE STUDENT WHO ATTENDS A PUBLIC SCHOOL IN
THE STATE;
4. ONE STUDENT WITH AN IEP WHO ATTENDS A PUBLIC
SCHOOL IN THE STATE;
5. ONE PARENT OF A CHILD WITH AN IEP WHO ATTENDS
A PUBLIC SCHOOL IN THE STATE;

HOUSE BILL 1491 3
6. ONE PARENT OF A PUBLIC SCHOOL STUDENT IN THE
STATE; AND
7. TWO MEMBERS WHO REPRESENT PRIVATE OR
NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS WITH EXPERIENCE IN TRANSPORTATION OR
INFRASTRUCTURE FUNDING.
(2) THE GOVERNOR SHALL DESIGNATE A CHAIR OF THE COMMISSION
FROM AMONG ITS MEMBERS.
(3) EACH MEMBER SERVES FOR A TERM OF 3 YEARS.
(4) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE STAFF AND OTHER
NECESSARY SUPPORT TO THE COMMISSION.
(5) A MEMBER OF THE COMMISSION MAY NOT RECEIVE
COMPENSATION FOR SERVING ON THE COMMISSION, BUT IS ENTITLED TO
REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE STANDARD STATE TRAVEL
REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(6) THE COMMISSION SHALL MEET AT LEAST FOUR TIMES A YEAR, OR
AS NECESSARY TO FULFILL ITS DUTIES.
(D) (1) THE PURPOSE OF THE COMMISSION IS TO IDENTIFY,
COORDINATE, AND SECURE FUNDING FOR SAFE PATHWAYS FOR STUDENTS
TRAVELING TO AND FROM SCHOOL.
(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL COLLABORATE WITH LOCAL
GOVERNMENTS, STATE AGENCIES, AND RELEVANT STAKEHOLDERS TO DEVELOP
INFRASTRUCTURE, PROGRAMS, AND GRANT STRATEGIES.
(E) THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) CONDUCT AN INVENTORY OF CURRENT SAFE PATHWAYS FOR
STUDENT TRAVEL;
(2) IDENTIFY GAPS IN SAFE PATHWAYS INFRASTRUCTURE AND
PROGRAMS;
(3) EVALUATE FUNDING NEEDS AND OPPORTUNITIES, INCLUDING
FEDERAL GRANTS, STATE TRANSPORTATION FUNDS, PRIVATE GRANTS, AND
PHILANTHROPIC CONTRIBUTIONS;

HOUSE BILL 1491
(4) DEVELOP A STRATEGIC PLAN TO COORDINATE
INTERJURISDICTIONAL INVESTMENTS AND MAXIMIZE AVAILABLE FUNDING;
(5) RECOMMEND POLICIES TO LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND STATE
AGENCIES TO MAXIMIZE AVAILABLE FUNDING;
(6) IDENTIFY INNOVATIVE PUBLIC–PRIVATE PARTNERSHIP MODELS
TO FUND SAFE PATHWAYS; AND
(7) FOSTER COMMUNITY ENGAGEMENT, INCLUDING INPUT FROM
STUDENTS, PARENTS, AND SCHOOL PERSONNEL.
(F) (1) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, THE COMMISSION
SHALL SUBMIT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE SENATE COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION,
ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT, AND THE HOUSE WAYS AND MEANS COMMITTEE
A REPORT THAT INCLUDES:
(I) AN ASSESSMENT OF CURRENT SAFE PATHWAYS;
(II) OPPORTUNITIES FOR FUNDING, INCLUDING CURRENT
FUNDING BEING PURSUED;
(III) RECOMMENDATIONS FOR POLICY AND INFRASTRUCTURE
IMPROVEMENTS; AND
(IV) THE PROGRESS IN IMPLEMENTING INTERJURISDICTIONAL
COORDINATION.
(2) THE REPORT MAY INCLUDE RECOMMENDATIONS FOR
LEGISLATION OR BUDGETARY APPROPRIATIONS THAT THE COMMISSION
CONSIDERS NECESSARY TO IMPROVE STUDENT SAFETY AND FUND
INFRASTRUCTURE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 7 years and, at the end of September
30, 2033, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.